examples/apertium-hin.hin.dix.xml
    <pardef n="म/ैं__prn">
       <e><p><l>ैं</l><r>ैं<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ुझ</l><r>ैं<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
	   <e><p><l>ेरे<b/>को</l><r>ैं<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obj"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ुझसे</l><r>ैं<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>	
       <e><p><l>ुझे</l><r>ैं<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
       <e r="LR"><p><l>ुझको</l><r>ैं<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
      <e><p><l>ेरा</l><r>ैं<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ेरे</l><r>ैं<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>	
       <e><p><l>ेरी</l><r>ैं<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ैंने</l><r>ैं<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ुझमें</l><r>ैं<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
     </pardef>
 
     <pardef n="ह/म__prn">
       <e><p><l>म</l><r>म<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
	   <e r="LR"><p><l>म<b/>लोगो</l><r>म<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
	   <e r="LR"><p><l>मलोगो</l><r>म<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
	   <e r="LR"><p><l>म<b/>लोग</l><r>म<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
	   <e r="LR"><p><l>मलोग</l><r>म<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>में</l><r>म<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
	   <e r="LR"><p><l>म<b/>लोगो को</l><r>म<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
	   <e r="LR"><p><l>म<b/>लोग<b/>को</l><r>म<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>मसे</l><r>म<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>	
       <e><p><l>में</l><r>म<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
       <e r="LR"><p><l>मको</l><r>म<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>मारा</l><r>म<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>मारी</l><r>म<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>मारे</l><r>म<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
	   <e r="LR"><p><l>म<b/>लोगो का</l><r>म<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
	   <e r="LR"><p><l>म<b/>लोगो की</l><r>म<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
	   <e r="LR"><p><l>म<b/>लोगो के</l><r>म<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
	   <e r="LR"><p><l>म<b/>लोग<b/>का</l><r>म<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
	   <e r="LR"><p><l>म<b/>लोग<b/>की</l><r>म<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
	   <e r="LR"><p><l>म<b/>लोग<b/>के</l><r>म<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>मने</l><r>म<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ममें</l><r>म<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p1"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>
 	<!-- all  त/ुम__prn pardef entries had s n="fam" tag after pl/sg/sp-->
     <pardef n="त/ुम__prn">   
       <e><p><l>ुम</l><r>ुम<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ुम</l><r>ुम<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ुमसे</l><r>ुम<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>	
       <e><p><l>ुम्हें</l><r>ुम<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
       <e r="LR"><p><l>ुमको</l><r>ुम<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ुम्हारा</l><r>ुम<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ुम्हारी</l><r>ुम<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ुम्हारे</l><r>ुम<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e> 
       <e><p><l>ुमने</l><r>ुम<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ुममें</l><r>ुम<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>  

       <e><p><l>ुम</l><r>ुम<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ुम</l><r>ुम<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ुमसे</l><r>ुम<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>	
       <e><p><l>ुम्हें</l><r>ुम<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ुम्हें</l><r>ुम<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r></p></e>
       <e r="LR"><p><l>ुमको</l><r>ुम<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ुम्हारा</l><r>ुम<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ुम्हारी</l><r>ुम<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ुम्हारे</l><r>ुम<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e> 
       <e><p><l>ुमने</l><r>ुम<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ुममें</l><r>ुम<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>  
     </pardef> 

     <pardef n="त/ू__prn">  
       <e><p><l>ू</l><r>ू<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ुझ</l><r>ू<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="obl"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ुझसे</l><r>ू<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r></p></e>	
       <e><p><l>ुझे</l><r>ू<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
       <e r="LR"><p><l>ुझको</l><r>ू<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="mf"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ेरा</l><r>ू<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ेरे</l><r>ू<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>	
       <e><p><l>ेरी</l><r>ू<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ूने</l><r>ू<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="erg"/></r></p></e>
       <e><p><l>ुझमें</l><r>ू<s n="prn"/><s n="pers"/><s n="p2"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r></p></e>
     </pardef> 

     <e lm="मैं"><i>म</i><par n="म/ैं__prn"/></e>
     <e lm="हम"><i>ह</i><par n="ह/म__prn"/></e>
     <e lm="तुम"><i>त</i><par n="त/ुम__prn"/></e>
     <e lm="तू"><i>त</i><par n="त/ू__prn"/></e>
